Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1619
Agricultural associations; monopolies; restraint of trade; Attorney General; complaint; notice of hearing.

If the Attorney General shall have reason to believe that any association described in section 59-1618 monopolizes or restrains trade to such an extent that the price of any agricultural product is unduly enhanced by reason thereof, he shall serve upon such association a complaint stating his charge in that respect, to which complaint shall be attached or in which shall be contained a notice of hearing, specifying a day and place not less than thirty days after the service thereof, requiring the association to show cause why an order should not be made directing it to cease and desist from monopolization or restraint of trade.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 26.